California, session 20252026, AB1051.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) For over 10,000 years, the Luiseño people have occupied the San Luis Rey Valley.(b) The largest Luiseño village on record, known as Topomai, was just north of the City of Oceanside where today, this historic area is a part of the Marine Corps Base Camp Pendleton.(c) The original territory of the Luiseño people encompassed the northwestern section of the present-day County of San Diego, including sections of coastline, lagoons, creeks, rivers, oak forests, and meadows.(d) What is now considered Route 76 was once a pathway for the Luiseño people to migrate from the valley to the coastline with the changing of the seasons.(e) This portion of land, including what is now Route 76, holds special historical and cultural significance to the Luiseño people.SEC. 2. Section 376 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:376. (a) Route 76 is from Route 5 near Oceanside to Route 79 near Lake Henshaw.(b) (1) The following portions of Route 76 in the County of San Diego shall be known and designated as the “Payómkawish Highway”:(A) From Sengme Oaks Road, at postmile 41.572, to Rincon Rancho Road, at postmile R34.223.(B) From Pauma Reservation Road, at postmile 28.990, to Pankey Road, at postmile R17.87.(2) The department shall determine the cost of appropriate signs, consistent with the signing requirements for the state highway system, showing the special designation described in paragraph (1) and, upon receiving donations from nonstate sources sufficient to cover the cost, shall erect those signs.